Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-131
Form of contribution.

(RULLCA 402) A contribution
may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to a limited
liability company, including money, services performed, promissory notes,
other agreements to contribute money or property, and contracts for services
to be performed.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 31.